inc/flattened/otw-generate-anl-surf-pairs-w-flattened-suffixes.xfscript
!!!!!
! Script with commands to compile flattened otw FST for verbs
!!!!!

! Definition of stem place-holders as special multichar symbols.

define StemPlaceHolders [ "^VERB^" | "^VERB_d2^" | "^VERB_m1^" | "^VERB_n1^" | "^VERB_s1^" | "^VERB_m^" | "^VERB_n^" ];

! Definition of person prefix tags (as special multichar symbols).

define PrefixTags [ "1+" | "2+" | "3+" | "X+" ];

! Definition of rule to remove all (prefixal) elements preceding stem place-holders,
! except person prefix tags and flags (achieved by setting 'flag-is-epsilon' ON).

! regex [ ? - [ PrefixTags | Flags ] -> 0 || _ ?* StemPlaceHolders ];
regex [ ? - PrefixTags -> 0 || _ ?* StemPlaceHolders ];
define rmNonMinimalPrefixes

! Reminder that the various LEXC files need to be concatenated together as: 'verb_lexicon_lexc'

! cat root.lexc verb_prefixes.lexc verb_stems_placeholders.lexc verb_suffixes_minimalist.lexc > verb_lexicon_minimalist.lexc

read lexc verb_lexicon_minimalist.lexc
define Morphology

set flag-is-epsilon ON

! Rule for remove all prefixal elements, except 1+, 2+, 3+, and X+, and flags.
! 1) Underlying/input side: remove all tags except 1+, 2+, 3+, X+, and flags.
! 2) Output/surface side: remove everything except flags.

regex [ [ [ Morphology .o. rmNonMinimalPrefixes ].i .o. rmNonMinimalPrefixes ].i ];
define MinimalMorphology

set flag-is-epsilon OFF

! Read in phonological rules that only apply in the context of suffix boundaries '>'.

source phonology-only-suffix-rules.xfscript
define Phonology

! Specify rule for retaining morpheme boundaries.
! 1) Attach flags to simple prefix and suffix boundary markers '<' or '>'.
! 2) Convert additional prefix and suffix boundary markers '<<' and '>>' into flags.

regex [ [..] -> "@P.Bx.Pref@" || "<" _ ,, [..] -> "@P.Bx.Suff@" || ">" _
,, "<<" -> "@P.Bx.Pref2@" ,, ">>" -> "@P.Bx.Suff2@"
];
define Bx2Flags

! Compose 1) morphological model with 2) rule attaching or convert boundaries to flags.

regex [ MinimalMorphology .o. Bx2Flags ] ;
define MorphologyBx

! Ignore flags when applying suffix phonology toggled by basic suffix boundaries '>'.

set flag-is-epsilon ON
regex [ MorphologyBx .o. Phonology ] ;
define MorphologyBx2

! Recognize flags again as characters
set flag-is-epsilon OFF

! Rule for converting flags back into the corresponding boundaries.

regex [ "@P.Bx.Pref@" -> "<" ] .o. [ "@P.Bx.Suff@" -> ">" ]
.o. [ "@P.Bx.Pref2@" -> "<<" ] .o. [ "@P.Bx.Suff2@" -> ">>" ] ;
define Flags2Bx

! Composing 1) morphology with flags for boundaries with 2) rule to convert flags
! back into boundaries.

regex [ MorphologyBx2 .o. Flags2Bx ] ;

! Outputting analysis-form pairs without flags for easier examination

set show-flags OFF
pairs > otw-verbs-flattened.pairs

! Outputting analysis-form pairs with flags for actual flattening

set show-flags ON
pairs > otw-verbs-flattened-w-flags.pairs

quit
